Maryland, session 2026, HB1406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
1–403.
A PERSON CHARGED WITH MURDER OR MANSLAUGHTER IN ANY DEGREE OR A
CRIME UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE MAY ASSERT THE DEFENSE
THAT THE PERSON ACTED IN SELF–DEFENSE AND NEED NOT PROVE THAT THE
PERSON BELIEVED DANGER WAS IMMINENT OR IMMEDIATE IF THE VICTIM HAD
PREVIOUSLY COMMITTED:
(1) AN ASSAULT IN ANY DEGREE AGAINST THE PERSON; OR
(2) AN ACT CONSTITUTING SEXUALLY ASSAULTIVE BEHAVIOR
AGAINST THE PERSON, AS DEFINED IN § 10–923 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1406*

HOUSE BILL 1406
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.